Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 3. Receiving Stolen Property

§ 2561.
Penalty for receiving stolen property; venue.

A person who is a dealer in property who buys, receives, sells, possesses unless with the intent to restore to the owner, or aids in the concealment of property, knowing or believing the property to be stolen, shall be punished the same as for the stealing of such property.

A person who buys, receives, sells, possesses unless with the intent to restore to the owner, or aids in the concealment of stolen property, knowing the same to be stolen, shall be punished the same as for the stealing of such property.

A buyer, receiver, seller, possessor, or concealer under subsection (a) or (b) of this section may be prosecuted and punished in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court in the unit where the person stealing the property might be prosecuted, although such property is bought, received, or concealed in another county or unit.

HISTORY:

Amended 1973, No. 118, § 5, eff. Oct. 1, 1973; 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 7; 1985, No. 183 (Adj. Sess.), § 7; 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 98.

§ 2562.
Joinder of counts for larceny and receiving stolen property.

In a complaint, information, or indictment for larceny against one or more persons, counts may be added for buying, receiving, selling, possessing unless with the intent to restore to the owner, or aiding in the concealment of property stolen or a part thereof, knowing the same to be stolen.
In such cause, the prosecutor shall not be put to his or her election, but upon one or more of the counts, the jury may convict or acquit one or more of the defendants, according to the proofs.

HISTORY:

Amended 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 2563.
Conviction of one or more joint respondents.

On trial of two or more persons upon complaint, information, or indictment, for jointly buying, receiving, selling, possessing unless with the intent to restore to the owner, or aiding in the concealment of stolen property, knowing the same to be stolen, if it is proved that one or more of the persons separately bought, received, sold, possessed unless with the intent to restore to the owner, or aided in the concealment of any such property, the jury may convict such of the persons as are proved to have bought, received, sold, possessed, or aided in the concealment of any part of such property, knowing the same to have been stolen.

HISTORY:

Amended 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 2564.
Conviction of person who stole property not required.

In a prosecution for buying, receiving, selling, possessing unless with the intent to restore to the owner, or aiding in the concealment of money or other property known to have been stolen, it shall not be necessary to aver nor on trial to prove that the person who stole the property has been convicted.

HISTORY:

Amended 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 10.